test/src/morphology/N-mua_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 


  Noun - mua: # Noun 'land / maa' - full paradigm
     mua+N+Sg+Nom: mua
     mua+N+Sg+Gen: muan
     mua+N+Sg+Acc: [mua, muan]
     mua+N+Sg+Par: muadu
     mua+N+Sg+Tra: muakse
     mua+N+Sg+Abe: [muatta, muata, muattah]
     mua+N+Sg+Com: muanke
     mua+N+Sg+Ine: muas
     mua+N+Sg+Ela: [muaspäi, muas]
     mua+N+Sg+Ill: muah
     mua+N+Sg+Ade: mual
     mua+N+Sg+Abl: [mualpäi, mual]
     mua+N+Sg+All: muale
     mua+N+Sg+Ess: muannu
     mua+N+Sg+Ter: muassah
     mua+N+Sg+Apr: mualluo
     mua+N+Pl+Nom: muat
     mua+N+Pl+Gen: mualoin
     mua+N+Pl+Acc: muat
     mua+N+Pl+Par: mualoi
     mua+N+Pl+Tra: mualoikse
     mua+N+Pl+Abe: [mualoitta, mualoita, mualoittah]
     mua+N+Pl+Com: mualoinke
     mua+N+Pl+Ine: mualois
     mua+N+Pl+Ela: [mualoispäi, mualois]
     mua+N+Pl+Ill: mualoihe
     mua+N+Pl+Ade: mualoil
     mua+N+Pl+Abl: [mualoilpäi, mualoil]
     mua+N+Pl+All: mualoile
     mua+N+Pl+Ess: mualoinnu
     mua+N+Pl+Inst: mualoin
     mua+N+Pl+Apr: mualoilluo
     mua+N+Sg+Nom+Clt/gi: muagi
     mua+N+Sg+Gen+Clt/gi: muangi
     mua+N+Sg+Acc+Clt/gi: [muagi, muangi]
     mua+N+Sg+Par+Clt/gi: muadugi
     mua+N+Sg+Tra+Clt/gi: muaksegi
     mua+N+Sg+Abe+Clt/gi: [muattagi, muatagi, muattahgi]
     mua+N+Sg+Com+Clt/gi: muankegi
     mua+N+Sg+Ine+Clt/gi: muasgi
     mua+N+Sg+Ela+Clt/gi: [muaspäigi, muasgi]
     mua+N+Sg+Ill+Clt/gi: muahgi
     mua+N+Sg+Ade+Clt/gi: mualgi
     mua+N+Sg+Abl+Clt/gi: [mualpäigi, mualgi]
     mua+N+Sg+All+Clt/gi: mualegi
     mua+N+Sg+Ess+Clt/gi: muannugi
     mua+N+Sg+Ter+Clt/gi: muassahgi
     mua+N+Sg+Apr+Clt/gi: mualluogi
     mua+N+Pl+Nom+Clt/gi: muatgi
     mua+N+Pl+Gen+Clt/gi: mualoingi
     mua+N+Pl+Acc+Clt/gi: muatgi
     mua+N+Pl+Par+Clt/gi: mualoigi
     mua+N+Pl+Tra+Clt/gi: mualoiksegi
     mua+N+Pl+Abe+Clt/gi: [mualoittagi, mualoitagi, mualoittahgi]
     mua+N+Pl+Com+Clt/gi: mualoinkegi
     mua+N+Pl+Ine+Clt/gi: mualoisgi
     mua+N+Pl+Ela+Clt/gi: [mualoispäigi, mualoisgi]
     mua+N+Pl+Ill+Clt/gi: mualoihegi
     mua+N+Pl+Ade+Clt/gi: mualoilgi
     mua+N+Pl+Abl+Clt/gi: [mualoilpäigi, mualoilgi]
     mua+N+Pl+All+Clt/gi: mualoilegi
     mua+N+Pl+Ess+Clt/gi: mualoinnugi
     mua+N+Pl+Inst+Clt/gi: mualoingi
     mua+N+Pl+Apr+Clt/gi: mualoilluogi
